District of Columbia statutes.
11-1103

Standards of practice for appointed counsel.

The Superior Court shall establish standards of practice for attorneys appointed as counsel in the Family Court of the Superior Court.

Jan. 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2108, Pub. L. 107-114, § 4(a)